Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1982
Transaction of title insurance business; requirements.

No person other than a domestic, foreign, or non-United-States title insurer organized on the stock plan and authorized under section 44-202 as a title insurer shall issue a title insurance policy or otherwise transact the business of title insurance in this state.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 5.